Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0501

Member's interest.

A member's interest:

(1) Is personal property;

(2) Consists of:

(a) Governance rights;

(b) Financial rights; and

(c) The right or obligation, if any, to do business with the limited cooperative association; and

(3) May be in certificated or uncertificated form.

[ 2019 c 37 s 501.]